Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
PART 5 Registration and Deposit of Securities

53-12-290.
How securities to be registered by corporate trustee.

Whenever a bank or trust company is duly authorized to act and is acting as a fiduciary, which term shall include an executor, administrator, trustee, guardian, or conservator, and has a nominee in whose name securities, including, without limitation, bonds, stocks, notes, and other evidences of title to intangible personal property, held as a fiduciary, may be registered, it shall be lawful to register securities in the name of the nominee without mention of the fiduciary relationship in the trust instrument evidencing the securities or on the books of the issuer of the same, provided that:

The records of the corporate fiduciary shall at all times clearly show that the securities are held by the corporate fiduciary in its capacity as fiduciary, together with the beneficial owner or owners thereof and all facts relating to its ownership, possession, and holding thereof; and

The corporate fiduciary shall not be relieved of liability for the safe custody, control, and proper distribution of the securities by reason of the registration of same in the name of any nominee.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-290

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

Cross references.

Uniform transfer on death security registration, §

53-5-60

et seq.

53-12-291.
Registration where two or more fiduciaries are acting jointly.

If two or more fiduciaries are acting jointly in reference to any securities, it shall be lawful to register the property in the name of any nominee or any joint corporate fiduciary. In the event that more than one corporate fiduciary is acting, it shall be lawful to register securities in the name of any nominee of any one of the corporate fiduciaries.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-291

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-292.
Deposit of securities in clearing corporation.

Any fiduciary holding securities in its fiduciary capacity, any bank or trust company holding securities as a custodian or managing agent, and any bank or trust company holding securities as custodian for a fiduciary shall be authorized to deposit or arrange for the deposit of the securities in a clearing corporation, as defined in Article 8 of Title 11. When the securities are deposited, certificates representing securities of the same class of the same issuer may be merged and held in bulk, in the name of the nominee of the clearing corporation, with any other such securities deposited in the clearing corporation by any person, regardless of the ownership of the securities, and certificates of small denominations may be merged into one or more certificates of larger denomination. The records of the fiduciary and the records of the bank or trust company acting as custodian, as managing agent, or as custodian for a fiduciary shall at all times show the name of the party for whose account the securities are deposited. Title to the securities may be transferred by bookkeeping entry on the books of the clearing corporation without physical delivery of certificates representing the securities.

A bank or trust company depositing securities pursuant to this Code section shall be subject to such rules and regulations as, in the case of state chartered institutions, the commissioner of banking and finance and, in the case of national banking associations, the comptroller of the currency may from time to time issue.

A bank or trust company acting as custodian for a fiduciary, on demand by the fiduciary, shall certify in writing to the fiduciary the securities deposited by the bank or trust company in the clearing corporation for the account of the fiduciary. A fiduciary, on demand by any party to a judicial proceeding for the settlement of the fiduciary’s account or on demand by the attorney for the party, shall certify in writing to the party the securities deposited by the fiduciary in the clearing corporation for its account as the fiduciary.

This Code section shall apply to any fiduciary holding securities in its fiduciary capacity and to any bank or trust company holding securities as a custodian, managing agent, or custodian for a fiduciary acting on April 13, 1973, or acting thereafter, regardless of the date of the agreement, instrument, or court order by which it is appointed and regardless of whether or not the fiduciary, custodian, managing agent, or custodian for a fiduciary owns capital stock of the clearing corporation.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-292

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.